Utah statutes.
11-14-316.   Publication of notice, resolution, or other proceeding -- Contest.

(1)  The governing body of any local political subdivision may provide for the publication of any resolution or other proceeding adopted under this chapter:

(a)  in a newspaper having general circulation in the local political subdivision; and

(b)  as required in Section 45-1-101.

(2)  When publication involves a resolution or other proceeding providing for the issuance of bonds, the governing body may, in lieu of publishing the entire resolution or other proceeding, publish a notice of bonds to be issued, titled as such, containing:

(a)  the name of the issuer;

(b)  the purpose of the issue;

(c)  the type of bonds and the maximum principal amount which may be issued;

(d)  the maximum number of years over which the bonds may mature;

(e)  the maximum interest rate which the bonds may bear, if any;

(f)  the maximum discount from par, expressed as a percentage of principal amount, at which the bonds may be sold;

(g)  a general description of the security pledged for repayment of the bonds; and

(h)  the times and place where a copy of the resolution or other proceeding may be examined, which shall be:

(i)  at an office of the issuer;

(ii)  identified in the notice;

(iii)  during regular business hours of the issuer as described in the notice; and

(iv)  for a period of at least 30 days after the publication of the notice.

(3)  For a period of 30 days after the publication, any person in interest may contest:

(a)  the legality of such resolution or proceeding;

(b)  any bonds which may be authorized by such resolution or proceeding; or

(c)  any provisions made for the security and payment of the bonds.

(4)  A person shall contest the matters set forth in Subsection (3) by filing a verified written complaint in the district court of the county in which he resides within the 30-day period.

(5)  After the 30-day period, no person may contest the regularity, formality, or legality of the resolution or proceeding for any reason.

